Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5446XS (4) 91 ss/ns S.F. 2109 Section 1. BASEMENT EGRESS WINDOWS ââ STUDY. The department 1 of inspections, appeals, and licensing shall conduct a study 2 regarding compliance with and sufficiency of fire safety code 3 requirements for basement egress windows in this state, which 4 must include a review of enforcement mechanisms available to 5 property owners and renters when a basement egress window is 6 not in compliance with fire safety code requirements. The 7 department shall submit a report to the general assembly, 8 including the departmentâs findings and recommendations, by 9 January 1, 2027. 10